Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.700

Overview—Intent.

The law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 is currently subject to policymaking by the legislature's joint committee on pension policy with ratification by the members of the legislature and is administered by the department of retirement systems.

Members of the plan have no direct input into the management of their retirement program. Forty-six other states currently have member representation in their pension management. Chapter 2, Laws of 2003 is intended to give management of the retirement program to the people whose lives are directly affected by it and who provide loyal and valiant service to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the state of Washington.

[ 2003 c 2 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 790, approved November 5, 2002).]